District of Columbia statutes.
38-273.03

Restriction on out-of-school discipline for pre-k age students.

(a)

Beginning in school year 2015-2016, no student of pre-k age may be expelled from any publicly funded community-based organization, school in the District of Columbia Public Schools system, or public charter school that provides pre-k care and education services to pre-k age children.

(b)

Beginning in school year 2015-2016, no student of pre-k age may receive an out-of- school suspension from any publicly funded community-based organization, school in the District of Columbia Public Schools system, or public charter school that provides pre-k care and education services to pre-k age children, unless it is determined by a school or program administrator that the student has willfully caused or attempted to cause bodily injury, or threatened serious bodily injury to another person, except in self-defense. No student of pre-k age may be suspended for longer than 3 days for any individual incident.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-202, § 303
as added June 23, 2015, D.C. Law 21-12, § 2(b), 62 DCR 5942